Utah statutes.
59-2-1319.   Receipts for payments -- Payment by warrant -- Cash payments
required -- Exceptions.
(1) If a person pays taxes in person at the county treasurer's office, the
county treasurer shall, upon request, give a receipt to the person paying the
taxes, specifying the amount of the taxes due, the property identification
number, and the aggregate amount of taxes paid.
(2)  County warrants shall be taken in payment of county taxes, city warrants
in payment of city taxes, and school district warrants in payment of school
district taxes.
(3)  All taxes shall be paid in cash, unless the county treasurer adopts rules
otherwise.
